Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

5-10-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Rental Purchase Agreement Act".

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 366, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.

5-10-102. Legislative declaration.

This article shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes and policies.

The underlying purposes and policies of this article are to:

Simplify, clarify, and modernize the law governing rental purchase agreements;

Provide certain disclosures to consumers who enter into rental purchase agreements and to promote consumer understanding of the terms of rental purchase agreements;

To protect consumers against unfair practices by some rental purchase dealers, having due regard for the interest of legitimate and scrupulous rental dealers; and

To permit and encourage the development of fair and economically sound rental purchase practices.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 366, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.

5-10-103. Waiver - agreement to forego rights - prohibited.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, a lessor or lessee, as those terms are defined in section 5-10-301, may not waive or agree to forego rights or benefits under this article, and any attempt to waive or agree to forego such rights or benefits is void.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 367, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.

5-10-104. Effective date.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 5-9-101, this article shall take effect January 1, 1991.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 367, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.

5-10-105. Supplementary general principles of law applicable.

Unless displaced by the particular provisions of this article, the "Uniform Commercial Code" and the principles of law and equity, including the law relative to capacity to contract, principal and agent, estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, bankruptcy, or other validating or invalidating cause, supplement the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 367, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.

Cross references:

For the "Uniform Commercial Code", see title 4.